Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.230

Uniform rules to be established.

The judges of the superior courts shall, from time to time, establish uniform rules for the government of the superior courts.

[ 1890 p 344 s 13; RRS s 36.]

NOTES:

Rule-making power, supreme court: RCW 2.04.180 through 2.04.210.

Superior court rules: State Constitution Art. 4 s 24.

Supplementary superior court rules: RCW 2.04.210.

Uniform court rules: RCW 2.16.040.